Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF739.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2025YH (2) 91 lh/ko H.F. 739 Section 1. MEDICAID ââ DENTAL WELLNESS PLAN FOR ADULTS ââ 1 REIMBURSEMENT. The department of health and human services 2 shall require any Medicaid dental plan contractor managing 3 the provision of dental care to Medicaid members through the 4 Medicaid dental wellness plan for adults to align reimbursement 5 rates for dental providers with the reimbursement rates for 6 dental providers under the healthy and well kids in Iowa 7 (Hawki) program under chapter 514I, in order to maximize dental 8 provider participation in and member access to dental services 9 under the Medicaid dental wellness plan for adults. 10